en: Marinated chicken drumsticks
fr: Manchons de poulet marinés

en: Marinated hacked chicken
fr: Hachés de poulet marinés

en: Chickens, chicken meat
af: hoender
ak: akokɔ
am: ዶሮ
ar: دجاج
as: কুকুৰা
av: ГӀанкӀу
ay: Chiwchi
az: Toyuq
ba: Тауыҡ
be: Курыца
bg: кокошка
bn: মুরগি
bo: བྱ་ཏེ་
br: yar
bs: Kokoška
ca: Pollastre, gall
ce: Kotam
cs: kur
cy: Iâr
da: høns
de: Hühnchen, Huhn, Hühner
ee: Koklo
el: Όρνιθα
eo: koko
es: pollo
et: Kana
eu: oilo
fa: مرغ خانگی
fi: kana
fj: Toa
fr: Poulets, poulet, Viande de poulet crue
ga: Sicín
gd: cearc
gl: Galo
gn: Ryguasu
ha: Kaza
he: תרנגול הבית
hi: मुर्गी
hr: kokoš
hu: Csirkék, csirke, házityúk
hy: հավ
ia: gallina
id: Ayam
io: hano
is: Kjúklingur
it: Polli, pollo
iu: ᐊ'ᐊ'ᐋᒃ
ja: 鶏肉, チキン
jv: Pitik
ka: ქათამი
kg: Nsusu
kk: Тауық
km: សាច់​មាន់
kn: ಕೋಳಿ
ko: 닭
ku: Mirîşk
ky: Tooк
la: Gallus
lb: Hong
li: Hoon
ln: Nsósó
lo: ໄກ່
lt: Višta, vištiena, vištienos mėsa
lv: vista
mk: кокошка
ml: കോഴി
mr: कोंबडी
ms: Ayam
nb: høns
ne: कुखुरा
nl: kippen, kip
nn: høns
nv: Naaʼahóóhai
ny: Nkhuku
pa: ਕੁੱਕੜ
pl: Kurczaki, kurczak, kura
pt: galinha
qu: Wallpa
ro: Găină
ru: курица
rw: Inkoko
sc: Pudda
sd: ڪڪڙ
sh: kokoš
sk: Kura
sl: kokoš
sn: Huku
so: Dooro
sq: Pula
sr: кокошка
su: Hayam
sv: Kycklingkött, Tamhöna
sw: Kuku
ta: கோழி
te: కోడి
tg: Мурғ
th: ไก่
tl: Manok
tr: Tavuk
tt: Өй тавыгы
uk: курка
ur: مرغی
uz: Tovuq
vi: gà
vo: gok
wa: Poye
wo: Ganaar
xh: Inkuku
yi: האן
za: Gaeq
zh: 鸡, 鸡肉

en: Whole chickens
fr: Poulets entiers

en: chicken meat without skin
fr: Viande de poulet sans peau

en: Chicken wings
bg: Пилешки крилца
de: Chicken Wings
es: Alitas de pollo
fi: Kanansiivet
fr: Ailes de poulet, aile de poulet
hr: Pileća krilca
ja: 鶏手羽先
nl: Kipfilets
tr: Tavuk kanadı
zh: 鸡翅

en: Chicken drumsticks
de: Hähnchenkeulen
fi: kanan koipinuija
fr: Manchons de poulet, manchon de poulet, pilons de poulet
hr: Pileći bataci
ja: 鶏骨付きもも肉
nl: Kippekluifen

en: Roasted chicken wing meat and skin, Baked chicken wing meat and skin
fr: Aile de poulet avec viande et peau rôtie, Aile de poulet avec viande et peau cuite au four

en: Frozen chicken wings
bg: Замразени пилешки крилца
fr: Ailes de poulet surgelées, aile de poulet surgelée

en: Chicken thighs, chicken legs
bg: Пилешки бутчета
ca: Cuixes de pollastre, Potes de pollastre
de: Hühnerschenkel, Hähnchenschenkel
es: Muslos de pollo
fi: kanan reidet
fr: Cuisses de poulet
hr: Pileći batak
it: Cosce di pollo, coscia di pollo
ja: 鶏もも肉
nl: Kippendijen, Kipdij
ru: Куриные бедра

en: Roasted chicken leg meat and skin, Baked chicken leg meat and skin
fr: Cuisse de poulet rôtie avec viande et peau, Cuisse de poulet cuite au four avec viande et peau

en: Roasted chicken leg meat, Baked chicken leg meat
fr: Cuisse de poulet rôtie sans peau, Cuisse de poulet cuite au four sans peau

en: Boiled chicken leg meat, Chicken leg meat cooked in water
fr: Cuisse de poulet bouillie, Cuisse de poulet cuite à l'eau

en: Boiled chicken leg with meat and skin, Chicken leg with meat and skin cooked in water
fr: Cuisse de poulet avec viande et peau bouillie, Cuisse de poulet avec viande et peau cuite à l'eau

en: Chicken cutlets
fi: kanaleikkeleet
fr: Escalopes de poulet, escalope de poulet
hr: Pileći kotleti
it: Cotolette di pollo

en: Chicken breasts
bg: Пилешки гърди
ca: Pits de pollastre
da: Kyllingebryst
de: Hähnchenbrustfilet, Hühnerbrust
es: Pechugas de pollo
fi: kanan rinnat
fr: Filets de poulet, Filet de poulet
he: חזה עוף
hr: Pileća prsa
hu: Csirkemellek
it: Petti di pollo
ja: 鶏むね肉
nl: Kippeborst
pt: Peitos de frango
ru: куриные грудки
zh: 鸡胸

en: Roasted chicken breast with meat and skin, Baked chicken breast with meat and skin
fr: Poitrine de poulet rôtie avec viande et peau, Poitrine de poulet cuite au four avec viande et peau

en: Cooked chicken breast without skin
fr: Filet de poulet sans peau cuit

en: Cooked chicken
ca: Pollastre precuinat
de: Gekochte Hühnchen
es: Pollo Preparado
fi: Kypsennetty kana
fr: Poulets cuisinés, Poulet cuisiné, Poulets préparés, Poulet préparé
he: עוף מבושל
hr: Kuhana piletina
it: Pollo cotto
nl: Geprepareerde kip
pt: Frango cozido

en: Roast chicken
de: Brathähnchen
es: Pollo asado
fi: paistettu kana
fr: Poulets rôtis, Poulet rôti
hr: Pečeno pile
it: Pollo arrosto
nl: Gegrilde kip
zh: 烤鸡